Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-10,107
School district property; use; lease authorized.

(1) The school board or board of education of any school district may permit the use, upon such terms and conditions as it determines, of any school district property or portion thereof at times when it is not needed for school district use.

(2) If the school board or board of education of any school district determines that any school district property or portion thereof is not currently needed for the use of the school district but may be needed for future use, the school board or board of education of any school district may lease such property, or portion thereof, upon such terms and conditions as it determines.

Laws 1988, LB 1077, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,142.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 753;

Laws 2015, LB513, § 1.